Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB172.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3(d) of the act of July 13, 1988 (P.L.530, No.94), known as the Environmental Hearing Board Act, is amended to read:Section 3. Board.* * *(d) Terms.--(1) A member of the board shall serve for a term of six years or until a successor is appointed and qualified. One of the additional members appointed under this act shall serve an initial term of four years. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) After the expiration of a term of a member of the board, the member shall be reappointed by the Governor with the consent of a majority of the members elected to the Senate.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0172PN0110 - 2 - 123456